District of Columbia statutes.
47-1711

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Aug. 17, 1937, 50 Stat. 675, ch. 690, title I, § 11
May 16, 1938, 52 Stat. 357, ch. 223, § 1(c)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(v)(2), 48 DCR 334
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”
1973 Ed., § 47-1411.
1981 Ed., § 47-1711.